nb: Krafttilbakemeldingstype: Remdrift; Strikktau; Direktedrift; Girdrift; Hybriddrift; Ingen krafttilbakemelding; Kun vibrasjon; Annet
bg-BG: Тип силова обратна връзка: Ремъчно задвижване; Еластичен кабел; Директно задвижване; Зъбно задвижване; Хибридно задвижване; Без силова обратна връзка; Само вибрация; Други
da: Force feedback-type: Remtræk; Elastiksnor; Direkte drev; Tandhjulsdrev; Hybrid drev; Ingen force feedback; Kun vibration; Andet
lt-LT: Jėgos grįžtamojo ryšio tipas: Diržinė pavara; Elastinė virvė; Tiesioginė pavara; Krumplinė pavara; Hibridinė pavara; Be jėgos grįžtamojo ryšio; Tik vibracija; Kita
sk-SK: Typ silovej spätnej väzby: Remeňový pohon; Elastický kábel; Priamy pohon; Prevod ozubenými kolesami; Hybridný pohon; Bez silovej spätnej väzby; Iba vibrácie; Iné
cs: Typ silové zpětné vazby: Páskový převod; Pružný kabel; Přímý pohon; Převodový pohon; Hybridní pohon; Bez silové zpětné vazby; Pouze vibrace; Jiné
vi: Loại phản hồi lực: Truyền động dây đai; Dây bungee; Truyền động trực tiếp; Truyền động bánh răng; Truyền động lai; Không có phản hồi lực; Chỉ rung; Khác
hu: Erő-visszacsatolás típusa: Szíjhajtás; Gumikötél; Közvetlen hajtás; Fogaskerék hajtás; Hibrid hajtás; Nincs erővisszajelzés; Csak vibráció; Egyéb
ru: Тип силовой обратной связи: Ременной привод; Эластичный шнур; Прямой привод; Зубчатый привод; Гибридный привод; Без силовой обратной связи; Только вибрация; Другой
fi: Voimapalautteen tyyppi: Hihnakoneisto; Joustinnauha; Suoraveto; Hammaspyöräkäyttö; Hybridikäyttö; Ei voimapalautetta; Vain värinä; Muu
zh-TW: 力回饋類型: 帶傳動式; 彈力繩; 直接驅動; 齒輪驅動; 混合驅動; 無力回饋; 僅震動; 其他
zh-CN: 力反馈类型: 皮带传动; 弹力绳; 直驱; 齿轮传动; 混合传动; 无力反馈; 仅振动; 其他
fr: Type de retour de force: Entraînement par courroie; Corde élastique; Entraînement direct; Entraînement par engrenages; Entraînement hybride; Pas de retour de force; Vibration uniquement; Autre
tr: Kuvvet geri bildirim tipi: Kayış Tahriki; Lastik kordon; Doğrudan tahrik; Dişli tahrikli; Hibrit tahrik; Kuvvet geri bildirimi yok; Sadece titreşim; Diğer
pt-BR: Tipo de force feedback: Correia de transmissão; Corda elástica; Acionamento direto; Acionamento por engrenagem; Acionamento híbrido; Sem feedback de força; Somente vibração; Outro
nl: Type force feedback: Riemaandrijving; Elastiekkoord; Directe aandrijving; Tandwielaandrijving; Hybride aandrijving; Geen force feedback; Alleen vibratie; Andere
de: Force-Feedback-Typ: Riemenantrieb; Bungeeseil; Direktantrieb; Zahnradantrieb; Hybridantrieb; Kein Force-Feedback; Nur Vibration; Sonstiges
ja: フォースフィードバックタイプ: ベルトドライブ; バンジーコード; ダイレクトドライブ; ギア駆動; ハイブリッド駆動; フォースフィードバックなし; 振動のみ; その他
ro-RO: Tip de feedback de forță: Transmisie cu curea; Cordon elastic; Transmisie directă; Transmisie cu angrenaje; Transmisie hibridă; Fără feedback de forță; Doar vibrație; Altele
hr-HR: Tip povratne informacije sile: Remenski pogon; Elastična užad; Direktni pogon; Zupčani pogon; Hibridni pogon; Bez povratne informacije o sili; Samo vibracija; Ostalo
pt-PT: Tipo de force feedback: Acionador de correia; Corda elástica; Transmissão direta; Transmissão por engrenagem; Transmissão híbrida; Sem retorno de força; Apenas vibração; Outro
th: ประเภทการตอบสนองแรง: สายพานขับ; สายยางยืด; ระบบขับเคลื่อนตรง; ระบบขับเคลื่อนแบบเกียร์; ระบบขับเคลื่อนแบบไฮบริด; ไม่มีฟอร์ซฟีดแบ็ก; การสั่นสะเทือนเท่านั้น; อื่นๆ
el: Τύπος ανάδρασης δύναμης: Μετάδοση με ιμάντα; Ελαστικό σχοινί; Άμεση κίνηση; Κίνηση με γρανάζια; Υβριδική κίνηση; Χωρίς ανάδραση δύναμης; Μόνο δόνηση; Άλλο
sv: Kraftåterkopplingstyp: Remdrivare; Elastiskt rep; Direktdrift; Kugghjulsdrift; Hybriddrift; Ingen kraftåterkoppling; Endast vibration; Övrigt
es: Tipo de retroalimentación de fuerza: Transmisión por correa; Cuerda elástica; Transmisión directa; Transmisión por engranajes; Transmisión híbrida; Sin retroalimentación de fuerza; Solo vibración; Otros
en: Force feedback type: Belt drive; Bungee cord; Direct drive; Gear drive; Hybrid drive; No force feedback; Vibration only; Other
pl: Typ sprzężenia zwrotnego siłowego: Napęd pasowy; Lina bungee; Napęd bezpośredni; Napęd zębaty; Napęd hybrydowy; Brak odczucia siły; Tylko wibracje; Inne
ko: 포스 피드백 유형: 벨트 드라이브; 번지 코드; 다이렉트 드라이브; 기어 드라이브; 하이브리드 드라이브; 포스 피드백 없음; 진동만; 기타
it: Tipo di force feedback: Trasmissione a cinghia; Elastico; Trasmissione diretta; Trasmissione a ingranaggi; Trasmissione ibrida; Senza force feedback; Solo vibrazione; Altro
sl-SI: Tip povratnih informacij sile: Jermenski pogon; Elastična vrvica; Neposredni pogon; Zobniški pogon; Hibridni pogon; Brez povratne informacije sile; Samo vibracija; Drugo